Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.04
Trails; public hearing; considerations.

Before establishing
a trail, the district shall consider, at a public hearing, all of the following:

(1) The proposed
route for the trail, including maps and illustrations, and the mode of travel
to be permitted;

(2) The areas adjacent to such route to be utilized by the district
for scenic, historic, natural, cultural, or developmental purposes;

(3) The characteristics
that make the proposed route suitable as a trail;

(4) The plans for developing,
operating, and maintaining the proposed trail;

(5) Any anticipated problems
enforcing the proper use of the proposed trail or hazards to private real
property adjacent to such trail;

(6) The current status of the real property
ownership and current and potential use of the real property in and along
the proposed route;

(7) The estimated cost of acquisition of the real property, or an
interest therein, needed for the proposed route; and

(8) The extent and type of
private real property interest needed to establish the proposed trail, the
right-of-way acquisition process to be followed, and the circumstances under
which eminent domain may be utilized.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 3.